Maryland, session 2025, SB0761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–504.1.
(a) This section applies to a defendant who is required to pay a fine OR CIVIL
PENALTY for one or more traffic offenses, including one or more citations for a violation of
a parking ordinance or regulation adopted under Title 26, Subtitle 3 of the Transportation
Article.
(b) (1) The District Court or a circuit court may authorize the clerk of the court
to approve an individual installment plan agreement in accordance with this section for the
payment of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0761*

SENATE BILL 761
(i) One or more citations for a payable violation issued under §
26–201 of the Transportation Article; [or]
(ii) One or more fines imposed at a hearing or trial by the court; OR
(III) ONE OR MORE CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER AN
AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM.
(2) A defendant who agrees to enter into an installment plan agreement for
the payment of one or more citations OR CIVIL CITATIONS under paragraph [(1)(i)] (1) of
this subsection consents to conviction OR CIVIL LIABILITY, AS APPROPRIATE, at the time
of the agreement.
(c) (1) A defendant who is sentenced to pay one or more fines OR CIVIL
PENALTIES that total at least $150 and certifies that the defendant is unable to pay the
fine [or], fines, CIVIL PENALTY, OR CIVIL PENALTIES may apply to the clerk of the court
to make installment payments in accordance with this section.
(2) An installment plan agreement under this section shall:
(i) Require that the defendant make installment payments on the
total amount of the fine [or], fines, CIVIL PENALTY, OR CIVIL PENALTIES covered by the
agreement; and
(ii) Specify the offenses and citations to which the agreement
applies.
(3) As a condition of an installment plan agreement, a defendant who
enters into the agreement shall inform the clerk of the court of any change of address during
the term of the agreement.
(4) (i) If a defendant fails to pay a fine OR CIVIL PENALTY in
accordance with an installment plan agreement under this section, the clerk of the court
may:
1. Refer the amount of the unpaid outstanding fine OR CIVIL
PENALTY to the Central Collection Unit of the Department of Budget and Management; or
2. Process the unpaid outstanding fine OR CIVIL PENALTY
as it would other outstanding fines OR CIVIL PENALTIES owed the court.
(ii) The clerk of the court shall provide notice to the defendant of the
disposition of the unpaid outstanding fine OR CIVIL PENALTY under subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph in the same manner required for other outstanding fines OR CIVIL
PENALTIES processed in the same manner.

SENATE BILL 761 3
(d) The requirements of subsection (c) of this section shall be posted in the clerk’s
office and on the website of the court.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.